Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XVIII.] STATE COMPREHENSIVE EMERGENCY

MEDICAL
SERVICES SYSTEM

Cross References

Enhanced 911 services for mobile phones, see chapter 138.

Peer support counseling; sessions, see §78-52.

Safe place for newborns, see chapter 587D.

Trauma system special fund, see §321-22.5.

Volunteer emergency medical disaster response personnel, see
§321-23.3.

§321-221 Findings and purpose. The
legislature finds that the establishment of a state comprehensive emergency
medical services system to include but not be limited to emergency medical
services for children is a matter of compelling state interest and necessary to
protect and preserve the health of the people of the State. A system designed
to reduce medical emergency deaths, injuries, and permanent long-term
disability through the implementation of a fully integrated, cohesive network
of components, the legislature further finds, will best serve the health needs
of the people. Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to establish and
maintain a state comprehensive emergency medical services system throughout the
State, and to fix the responsibility for the administration of this state
system which shall provide for the arrangement of personnel, facilities, and
equipment for the effective and coordinated delivery of health care services
under emergency conditions whether occurring as the result of a patient's
condition or of natural disasters or other causes. The system shall provide
for personnel, personnel training, communications, emergency transportation,
facilities, coordination with emergency medical and critical care services,
coordination and use of available public safety agencies, promotion of consumer
participation, accessibility to care, mandatory standard medical recordkeeping,
consumer information and education, independent review and evaluation, disaster
linkage, mutual aid agreements, and other components necessary to meet the
purposes of this part. [L 1978, c 148, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 93, §1; am L
1994, c 242, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next